Vermont, session 2025-2026, S302.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 4651 is amended to read:
§ 4651. PROHIBITED DISCLOSURE OF PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Personally identifying information” means information concerning
a person’s sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, race, color,
religion, national origin, immigration status, age, or disability.
VT LEG #385901 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.302
2026 Page 2 of 4
(2) “Public agency” has the same meaning as in 1 V.S.A. § 317 and
shall include includes all officers, employees, agents, and independent
contractors of the public agency.
(b) A public agency shall not:
(1) collect information regarding the:
(A) immigration status of an individual, unless the collection is for a
specific and articulable purpose required by State or federal law; or
(B) religious beliefs, practices, or affiliation of any individual for the
purpose of registration of an individual based on his or her the individual’s
religious beliefs, practices, or affiliations;
(2) knowingly disclose personally identifying information to any federal
agency or official for the purpose of registration or tracking of an individual
based on his or her the individual’s personally identifying information; or
(3) use public agency money, facilities, property, equipment, or
personnel to assist in creating or enforcing any federal government program for
the registration of an individual based on his or her the individual’s personally
identifying information.
(c) Any section, term, or provision of an agreement in existence on the
effective date of this section (March 28, 2017) that conflicts with subsection
(b) of this section shall be invalidated on that date to the extent of the conflict.
VT LEG #385901 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.302
2026 Page 3 of 4
(d) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit or impede any public
agency from complying with the lawful requirements of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 and
1644. To the extent any State or local law enforcement policy or practice
conflicts with the lawful requirements of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 and 1644, said
policy or practice is, to the extent of such conflict, abolished.
(e) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit or impede any public
agency from disclosing or exchanging aggregated information that cannot be
used to identify an individual with any other public agency or federal agency
or official.
Sec. 2. REPORTING OF CONTINUED COLLECTION OF IMMIGRATION
INFORMATION
Each public agency that, after the effective date of this act, continues to
collect immigration status information of individuals residing in this State
shall, on or before December 15, 2026, submit to the Office of the Attorney
General in a form and manner prescribed by the Office a written explanation as
to why the public agency continues to collect the information. The explanation
shall include a reference to the specific State or federal law that the public
agency believes requires the continued collection. The Office shall compile
the explanations it receives from public agencies pursuant to this section and
shall, on or before March 15, 2027, provide a written report to the House and
Senate Committees on Judiciary that summarizes the explanations and
VT LEG #385901 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.302
2026 Page 4 of 4
provides an opinion as to whether the continued collections comply with this
act.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385901 v.1